Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1522
Tribal customary adoption; transfers to tribal court.

Nothing in sections 43-1518 to 43-1521 is intended to prevent the transfer of proceedings to a tribal court when transfer is otherwise permitted under applicable law.

Laws 2026, LB1032, § 27.
July 18, 2026